Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB77.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 5 of this Act:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture;
(2) "Drug developer" means a for-profit, nonprofit, or public benefit corporation engaged in drug development
and manufacturing that has established an ibogaine drug development agreement with at least one (1)
additional state with a plan to conduct drug development clinical trials to obtain United States Food and
Drug Administration approval for use of ibogaine; and
(3) "Ibogaine":
(a) Means a crystalline alkaloid psychogenic compound obtained from the Tabernanthe iboga plant; and
(b) Includes any of its derivatives or analogs in any form, whether existing or as-yet to be developed.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency fund entitled the ibogaine research and
intellectual property fund, to be administered by the department for the purpose of allowing the department
to enter into a public-private partnership with a drug developer to conduct a clinical drug development trial
or trials related to the use of ibogaine for the treatment of opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use
disorder, or any other neurological or mental health condition for which ibogaine demonstrates efficacy.
(2) The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds, both public and
private. Moneys deposited in the fund are to be used for the purposes set out in Sections 1 to 5 of this Act.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any interest or other income earned from the investments, along with the
unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next
fiscal year.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before the department may contract with a drug developer, the drug developer shall provide the department
with:
(a) A detailed description of the drug developer’s strategy for obtaining approval for the drug
development clinical trials from the United States Food and Drug Administration and a detailed drug
development clinical trial design, including a description of the composition of the consortium's drug
development clinical trial team and the expertise of the team members;
(b) Protocols for clinical trial participant recruitment, patient screening criteria, administration, after-
care, and post-acute treatment support;
(c) A plan to seek a breakthrough therapy designation for ibogaine from the United States Food and
Drug Administration under 21 U.S.C. sec. 356;
(d) Financial disclosures necessary to verify that the drug developer is prepared to meet its full
obligations under this section; and
(e) Certification of an existing ibogaine drug development agreement with one (1) or more other states
or state-sponsored consortiums.
(2) Before the department may contract with a drug developer, the department shall negotiate a contract
requiring the drug developer to substantially agree to:
(a) Match the Commonwealth’s investment in drug development clinical trials with ibogaine with an
equal amount of additional funding and to devote this total amount in drug development clinical
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
trials conducted within the Commonwealth. These trials shall exclusively use in-state clinicians,
facilities, and study participants;
(b) Provide reports as specified under Section 4 of this Act;
(c) Establish a plan to ensure broad and accessible ibogaine treatment access to patients within the
Commonwealth following approval of ibogaine by the United States Food and Drug Administration
by diverse means, including but not limited to:
1. Providing priority access to ibogaine treatment to residents of the Commonwealth;
2. Seeking third-party payor approval for ibogaine treatment within the Commonwealth;
3. Developing means of access to ibogaine treatment within the Commonwealth for uninsured
and low-income individuals; and
4. Training and credentialing medical providers within the Commonwealth to administer
ibogaine treatment; and
(d) Provide a plan to recognize the Commonwealth’s economic interest in the intellectual property
generated over the course of the multistate drug development clinical trials with ibogaine, consisting
of a share of the proceeds from said intellectual property which is proportional to the
Commonwealth’s contribution to the total cost of the multistate drug development trials, and to
deposit the state’s share of those proceeds in the ibogaine research and intellectual property fund
established in Section 2 of this Act at agreed-upon intervals during the period for which the drug
development clinical trials are funded and during any subsequent period of commercialization.
(3) In negotiating a contract with the drug developer, the department may agree to additional terms and make
reasonable deviations from the requirements of this section as long as the resulting contract is fair and
creates substantially equivalent value for the Commonwealth.
(4) For purposes of this section, intellectual property rights and other commercial rights arising from
multistate drug development clinical trials with ibogaine include any of the following as related to these
trials:
(a) Intellectual property, technology, and inventions;
(b) Patents, trademarks, and licenses;
(c) Proprietary and confidential information;
(d) Trade secrets, data, and databases;
(e) Tools, methods, and processes;
(f) Treatment models or techniques;
(g) Administration protocols; and
(h) Works of authorship.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The drug developer shall quarterly prepare and submit to the department a:
(a) Report on the progress of any multistate drug development clinical trials with ibogaine conducted
pursuant to Sections 1 to 5 of this Act; and
(b) Financial status report, including information to verify expenditures of Commonwealth funds and
required matching funds.
(2) The department shall submit an annual report by December 1 each year to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services on the progress of the drug
development clinical trials and their related financial status until the clinical trials are concluded.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
All receipts from the proceeds from the commercialization of intellectual property created through the public-
private partnership created under Sections 1 to 5 of this Act shall be deposited into the ibogaine research and
intellectual property fund established in Section 2 of this Act. Expenditures from the fund shall be used only for
programs or research benefitting at-risk populations that suffer from conditions treatable with ibogaine, including

CHAPTER 158 3
but not limited to opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use disorder, post-traumatic stress disorder,
traumatic brain injury, and other neurological or mental health disorders.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version